test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-lex_kulgad_gt-norm.gen.yaml
Config: 
  hfst: 
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox: 
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests: 

  Verb - kulgâđ: #
    kulgâđ+V+Inf: kulgâđ
    kulgâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: kuulgâm
    kulgâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg2: kuulgah
    kulgâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: kolgá
    kulgâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du1: kolgeen
    kulgâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du2: kulgâvettee
    kulgâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du3: kulgâv
    kulgâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl1: kulgâp
    kulgâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2: kulgâvetteđ
    kulgâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: kolgeh
    kulgâđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1: kulgim
    kulgâđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg2: kulgih
    kulgâđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: kuulgâi
    kulgâđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du1: kuulgáim
    kulgâđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du2: kuulgáid
    kulgâđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du3: kuulgáin
    kulgâđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl1: kuulgâim
    kulgâđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl2: kuulgâid
    kulgâđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: kulgii
    kulgâđ+V+Cond+Prs+Sg1: kulgâččim
    kulgâđ+V+Cond+Prs+Sg2: kulgâččih
    kulgâđ+V+Cond+Prs+Sg3: kulgâččij
    kulgâđ+V+Cond+Prs+Du1: kulgâččáim
    kulgâđ+V+Cond+Prs+Du2: kulgâččáid
    kulgâđ+V+Cond+Prs+Du3: kulgâččáin
    kulgâđ+V+Cond+Prs+Pl1: kulgâččijm
    kulgâđ+V+Cond+Prs+Pl2: kulgâččijd
    kulgâđ+V+Cond+Prs+Pl3: kulgâččii
    kulgâđ+V+Pot+Prs+Sg1: kolgeem
    kulgâđ+V+Pot+Prs+Sg2: kolgeeh
    kulgâđ+V+Pot+Prs+Sg3: kuulgâš
    kulgâđ+V+Pot+Prs+Du1: kulgâžeen
    kulgâđ+V+Pot+Prs+Du2: kuulgâšvettee
    kulgâđ+V+Pot+Prs+Du3: kulgâžává
    kulgâđ+V+Pot+Prs+Pl1: kulgâžep
    kulgâđ+V+Pot+Prs+Pl2: kuulgâšvetteđ
    kulgâđ+V+Pot+Prs+Pl3: kulgâžeh
    kulgâđ+V+Imprt+Sg2: kuulgâ
    kulgâđ+V+Imprt+Sg3: kolgos
    kulgâđ+V+Imprt+Du1: kolgoon
    kulgâđ+V+Imprt+Du2: kolgee
    kulgâđ+V+Imprt+Du3: kolgoos
    kulgâđ+V+Imprt+Pl1: kolgop
    kulgâđ+V+Imprt+Pl2: kulgâđ
    kulgâđ+V+Imprt+Pl3: kolgoos
    kulgâđ+V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg: kuulgâ
    kulgâđ+V+Ind+Prt+ConNeg: kulgâm
    kulgâđ+V+Cond+Prs+ConNeg: kulgâččii
    kulgâđ+V+Pot+Prs+ConNeg: kulgii
    kulgâđ+V+Imprt+ConNeg: kuulgâ
    kulgâđ+V+PrsPrc: kolgee
    kulgâđ+V+PrfPrc: kulgâm
    kulgâđ+V+Actio+Nom: kulgâm
    kulgâđ+V+Actio+Ess: kulgâmin
    kulgâđ+V+Actio+Loc: kulgâmist
    kulgâđ+V+Actio+Ill: kulgâmân
    kulgâđ+V+Actio+Com: kulgâdijn
    kulgâđ+V+VAbess: kulgâhánnáá

  Verb - čurmâđ: #
    čurmâđ+V+Inf: čurmâđ
    čurmâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: čuurmâm
    čurmâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg2: čuurmah
    čurmâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: čormá
    čurmâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du1: čormeen
    čurmâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du2: čurmâvettee
    čurmâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du3: čurmâv
    čurmâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl1: čurmâp
    čurmâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2: čurmâvetteđ
    čurmâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: čormeh
